Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 19.2 Motorized Tricycles

31-19.2-1.
License required to operate.

No person shall operate a motorized tricycle upon a highway in this state unless the person has a valid license as an operator under the provisions of chapter 10 of this title and shall be at least sixteen (16) years of age.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 377, § 4.

31-19.2-2.
Driving on interstate highways prohibited.

No person shall operate a motorized tricycle upon an interstate highway within this state. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 377, § 4; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 115.